apertium-tlh.tlh.lexc
LEXICON VerbalPrefixes

@P.SUBJ.SG1@:@P.SUBJ.SG1@jI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG2@:@P.SUBJ.SG2@bI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG3@:@P.SUBJ.SG3@0     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL1@:@P.SUBJ.PL1@ma     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL2@:@P.SUBJ.PL2@Su     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL3@:@P.SUBJ.PL3@0     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG1@:@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG1@cho     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.SG1@:@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.SG1@mu     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG1@:@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG1@tu     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.SG1@:@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.SG1@mu     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.SG2@:@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.SG2@qa     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.SG2@:@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.SG2@Du     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.SG2@:@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.SG2@pI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.SG2@:@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.SG2@nI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.SG3@vI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG3@Da     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.SG3@0     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.SG3@wI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG3@bo     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.SG3@lu     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL1@:@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL1@ju     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.PL1@:@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.PL1@nu     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL1@:@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL1@che     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.PL1@:@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.PL1@nu     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.PL2@:@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.PL2@Sa     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.PL2@:@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.PL2@lI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.PL2@:@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.PL2@re     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.PL2@:@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.PL2@lI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.SUBJ.SG1@@P.OBJ.PL3@vI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL3@Da     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.SUBJ.SG3@@P.OBJ.PL3@0     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.SUBJ.PL1@@P.OBJ.PL3@DI     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL3@bo     Verbs ;
@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.SUBJ.PL3@@P.OBJ.PL3@0     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@yI     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@pe     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG1@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG1@HI     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG1@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG1@HI     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.SG3@yI     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG3@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.SG3@yI     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL1@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL1@gho     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL1@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL1@gho     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.SG2@@P.OBJ.PL3@tI     Verbs ;
@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL3@:@P.IMP.ON@@P.SUBJ.PL2@@P.OBJ.PL3@tI     Verbs ;

LEXICON Reflexive

%<ref%>:’egh   Volition?   ;
%<rec%>:chuq  Volition?   ;

LEXICON Volition

nIs%<foc%>+:nIS    Change? ;
qang%<foc%>+:qang  Change? ;
rup%<foc%>+:rup    Change? ;
beH%<foc%>+:beH    Change? ;
vIp%<foc%>+:vIp    Change? ;

LEXICON Change

+choh%<foc%>:choh  Cause?  ;
+qa’%<foc%>:qa’    Cause?  ;

LEXICON Cause

%<cau%>:moH   Definite?   ;

LEXICON Definite

+lu’%<foc%>:lu’    Qualification?  ;
+laH%<foc%>:laH    Qualification?  ;

LEXICON Qualification

+chu’%<foc%>:chu’  Aspect? ;
+bej%<foc%>:bej    Aspect? ;
+law’%<foc%>:law’  Aspect? ;

LEXICON Aspect

%<past%>:pu’   Honorific?  ;
%<past%>:ta’   Honorific?  ;
%<cont%>:taH   Honorific?  ;
%<prog%>:lI’   Honorific?  ;

LEXICON Honorific

%<honor%>:neS  Others? ;

LEXICON Others

+DI’%<foc%>:DI’    ENDLEX1   ;
+chugh%<foc%>:chugh    ENDLEX1   ;
+pa’%<foc%>:pa’    ENDLEX1   ;
+vIS%<foc%>:vIS    ENDLEX1   ;
+bogh%<foc%>:bogh  ENDLEX1   ;
+meh%<foc%>:meH    ENDLEX1   ;
+’a’%<qst%>:’a’    ENDLEX1   ;
+wI%<n%>:wI’    Augmentation?   ;


LEXICON Reflexive?

0   Reflexive   ;
0    Volition?   ;
%<neg%>:be’ Reflexive ;
%<neg%>:be’ Volition? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Reflexive ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Volition? ;

%<der_ghach%>:ghach Augmentation? ;

LEXICON Volition?

0   Volition    ;
0   Change? ;
%<neg%>:be’ Change? ;
%<neg%>:be’ Volition ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Change? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Volition ;

LEXICON Change?

0   Change  ;
0   Cause?  ;
%<neg%>:be’ Change ;
%<neg%>:be’ Cause? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Change ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Cause? ;

LEXICON Cause?

0   Cause   ;
0   Definite?   ;
%<neg%>:be’ Cause ;
%<neg%>:be’ Definite? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Cause ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Definite? ;

LEXICON Definite?

0   Definite    ;
0   Qualification?   ;
%<neg%>:be’ Definite ;
%<neg%>:be’ Qualification? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Definite ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Qualification? ;

LEXICON Qualification?

0   Qualification   ;
0   Aspect? ;
%<neg%>:be’ Aspect? ;
%<neg%>:be’ Qualification ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Aspect? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Qualification ;

LEXICON Aspect?

0   Aspect  ;
0   Honorific?  ;
%<neg%>:be’ Aspect ;
%<neg%>:be’ Honorific? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Aspect ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Honorific? ;

LEXICON Honorific?

0   Honorific   ;
0   Others?  ;
%<neg%>:be’ Others? ;
%<neg%>:be’ Honorific ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Others? ;
%<emph%>:qu’ Honorific ;

LEXICON Others?

0   Others  ;
0   ENDLEX1   ;

LEXICON ENDLEX1

@D.IMP.ON@ ENDLEX2 ;
@R.IMP.ON@%<imp%>:@R.IMP.ON@ ENDLEX2 ;

LEXICON ENDLEX2

@D.SUBJ@ ENDLEX3 ;
@R.SUBJ.SG1@%<p1%>%<sg%>:@R.SUBJ.SG1@ ENDLEX3 ;
@R.SUBJ.SG2@%<p2%>%<sg%>:@R.SUBJ.SG2@ ENDLEX3 ;
@R.SUBJ.SG3@%<p3%>%<sg%>:@R.SUBJ.SG3@ ENDLEX3 ;
@R.SUBJ.PL1@%<p1%>%<pl%>:@R.SUBJ.PL1@ ENDLEX3 ;
@R.SUBJ.PL2@%<p2%>%<pl%>:@R.SUBJ.PL2@ ENDLEX3 ;
@R.SUBJ.PL3@%<p3%>%<pl%>:@R.SUBJ.PL3@ ENDLEX3 ;

LEXICON ENDLEX3

@D.OBJ@ # ;
@R.OBJ.SG1@%<o_sg1%>:@R.OBJ.SG1@ # ;
@R.OBJ.SG2@%<o_sg2%>:@R.OBJ.SG2@ # ;
@R.OBJ.SG3@%<o_sg3%>:@R.OBJ.SG3@ # ;
@R.OBJ.PL1@%<o_pl1%>:@R.OBJ.PL1@ # ;
@R.OBJ.PL2@%<o_pl2%>:@R.OBJ.PL2@ # ;
@R.OBJ.PL3@%<o_pl3%>:@R.OBJ.PL3@ # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

LEXICON Verbs
baj%<vblex%>:baj   Reflexive?  ;
baQ%<vblex%>:baQ   Reflexive?  ;
bej%<vblex%>:bej   Reflexive?  ;
beQ%<vblex%>:beQ   Reflexive?  ;
bIr%<vblex%>:bIr   Reflexive?  ;
bogh%<vblex%>:bogh   Reflexive?  ;
bom%<vblex%>:bom   Reflexive?  ;
boQ%<vblex%>:boQ   Reflexive?  ;
buD%<vblex%>:buD   Reflexive?  ;
buSHa’%<vblex%>:buSHa’   Reflexive?  ;
chach%<vblex%>:chach   Reflexive?  ;
chargh%<vblex%>:chargh   Reflexive?  ;
chech%<vblex%>:chech   Reflexive?  ;
che’%<vblex%>:che’   Reflexive?  ;
chergh%<vblex%>:chergh   Reflexive?  ;
chID%<vblex%>:chID   Reflexive?  ;
chIp%<vblex%>:chIp   Reflexive?  ;
cho’%<vblex%>:cho’   Reflexive?  ;
choptaH%<vblex%>:choptaH   Reflexive?  ;
chov%<vblex%>:chov   Reflexive?  ;
chu’%<vblex%>:chu’   Reflexive?  ;
chun%<vblex%>:chun   Reflexive?  ;
chuy%<vblex%>:chuy   Reflexive?  ;
Daj%<vblex%>:Daj   Reflexive?  ;
Dan%<vblex%>:Dan   Reflexive?  ;
Dech%<vblex%>:Dech   Reflexive?  ;
Del%<vblex%>:Del   Reflexive?  ;
DIj%<vblex%>:DIj   Reflexive?  ;
DIv%<vblex%>:DIv   Reflexive?  ;
Do’Ha’%<vblex%>:Do’Ha’   Reflexive?  ;
Do’%<vblex%>:Do’   Reflexive?  ;
Dor%<vblex%>:Dor   Reflexive?  ;
DuD%<vblex%>:DuD   Reflexive?  ;
Dun%<vblex%>:Dun   Reflexive?  ;
Duy’%<vblex%>:Duy’   Reflexive?  ;
ghang%<vblex%>:ghang   Reflexive?  ;
ghay%<vblex%>:ghay   Reflexive?  ;
gheS%<vblex%>:gheS   Reflexive?  ;
ghIj%<vblex%>:ghIj   Reflexive?  ;
ghIr%<vblex%>:ghIr   Reflexive?  ;
ghoD%<vblex%>:ghoD   Reflexive?  ;
ghomHa’%<vblex%>:ghomHa’   Reflexive?  ;
ghoq%<vblex%>:ghoq   Reflexive?  ;
ghoS%<vblex%>:ghoS   Reflexive?  ;
ghum%<vblex%>:ghum   Reflexive?  ;
ghup%<vblex%>:ghup   Reflexive?  ;
Hab%<vblex%>:Hab   Reflexive?  ;
HaH%<vblex%>:HaH   Reflexive?  ;
Haq%<vblex%>:Haq   Reflexive?  ;
Haw’%<vblex%>:Haw’   Reflexive?  ;
HeD%<vblex%>:HeD   Reflexive?  ;
Hem%<vblex%>:Hem   Reflexive?  ;
HeS%<vblex%>:HeS   Reflexive?  ;
HIj%<vblex%>:HIj   Reflexive?  ;
HoH’egh%<vblex%>:HoH’egh   Reflexive?  ;
Ho’%<vblex%>:Ho’   Reflexive?  ;
HoSghaj%<vblex%>:HoSghaj   Reflexive?  ;
Hot%<vblex%>:Hot   Reflexive?  ;
Huj%<vblex%>:Huj   Reflexive?  ;
Hup%<vblex%>:Hup   Reflexive?  ;
Hutlh%<vblex%>:Hutlh   Reflexive?  ;
ja’chuq%<vblex%>:ja’chuq   Reflexive?  ;
ja’%<vblex%>:ja’   Reflexive?  ;
jaQ%<vblex%>:jaQ   Reflexive?  ;
jech%<vblex%>:jech   Reflexive?  ;
jejHa’%<vblex%>:jejHa’   Reflexive?  ;
jen%<vblex%>:jen   Reflexive?  ;
jeS%<vblex%>:jeS   Reflexive?  ;
jIH%<vblex%>:jIH   Reflexive?  ;
jIr%<vblex%>:jIr   Reflexive?  ;
jol%<vblex%>:jol   Reflexive?  ;
joq%<vblex%>:joq   Reflexive?  ;
jotlh%<vblex%>:jotlh   Reflexive?  ;
jub%<vblex%>:jub   Reflexive?  ;
juS%<vblex%>:juS   Reflexive?  ;
laD%<vblex%>:laD   Reflexive?  ;
lam%<vblex%>:lam   Reflexive?  ;
laQ%<vblex%>:laQ   Reflexive?  ;
lay’%<vblex%>:lay’   Reflexive?  ;
leH%<vblex%>:leH   Reflexive?  ;
leS%<vblex%>:leS   Reflexive?  ;
lIgh%<vblex%>:lIgh   Reflexive?  ;
lIng%<vblex%>:lIng   Reflexive?  ;
lIS%<vblex%>:lIS   Reflexive?  ;
lob%<vblex%>:lob   Reflexive?  ;
lo’laH%<vblex%>:lo’laH   Reflexive?  ;
lol%<vblex%>:lol   Reflexive?  ;
lop%<vblex%>:lop   Reflexive?  ;
lugh%<vblex%>:lugh   Reflexive?  ;
lul%<vblex%>:lul   Reflexive?  ;
lutlh%<vblex%>:lutlh   Reflexive?  ;
maq%<vblex%>:maq   Reflexive?  ;
matlh%<vblex%>:matlh   Reflexive?  ;
mech%<vblex%>:mech   Reflexive?  ;
mer%<vblex%>:mer   Reflexive?  ;
mIm%<vblex%>:mIm   Reflexive?  ;
mISmoH%<vblex%>:mISmoH   Reflexive?  ;
moD%<vblex%>:moD   Reflexive?  ;
moj%<vblex%>:moj   Reflexive?  ;
morgh%<vblex%>:morgh   Reflexive?  ;
mub%<vblex%>:mub   Reflexive?  ;
muH%<vblex%>:muH   Reflexive?  ;
mun%<vblex%>:mun   Reflexive?  ;
mutlh%<vblex%>:mutlh   Reflexive?  ;
nab%<vblex%>:nab   Reflexive?  ;
na’%<vblex%>:na’   Reflexive?  ;
nap%<vblex%>:nap   Reflexive?  ;
naS%<vblex%>:naS   Reflexive?  ;
nenchoH%<vblex%>:nenchoH   Reflexive?  ;
ngagh%<vblex%>:ngagh   Reflexive?  ;
ngej%<vblex%>:ngej   Reflexive?  ;
ngI’%<vblex%>:ngI’   Reflexive?  ;
ngo’%<vblex%>:ngo’   Reflexive?  ;
nguvmoH%<vblex%>:nguvmoH   Reflexive?  ;
nIt%<vblex%>:nIt   Reflexive?  ;
noj%<vblex%>:noj   Reflexive?  ;
noy%<vblex%>:noy   Reflexive?  ;
nuS%<vblex%>:nuS   Reflexive?  ;
paS%<vblex%>:paS   Reflexive?  ;
pe’’egh%<vblex%>:pe’’egh   Reflexive?  ;
pID%<vblex%>:pID   Reflexive?  ;
pIQ%<vblex%>:pIQ   Reflexive?  ;
pol%<vblex%>:pol   Reflexive?  ;
pov%<vblex%>:pov   Reflexive?  ;
pup%<vblex%>:pup   Reflexive?  ;
Qach%<vblex%>:Qach   Reflexive?  ;
qalmoH%<vblex%>:qalmoH   Reflexive?  ;
qa’%<vblex%>:qa’   Reflexive?  ;
qaS%<vblex%>:qaS   Reflexive?  ;
Qaw’%<vblex%>:Qaw’   Reflexive?  ;
qeH%<vblex%>:qeH   Reflexive?  ;
Qeq%<vblex%>:Qeq   Reflexive?  ;
QeyHa’%<vblex%>:QeyHa’   Reflexive?  ;
QIH%<vblex%>:QIH   Reflexive?  ;
QIp%<vblex%>:QIp   Reflexive?  ;
QoD%<vblex%>:QoD   Reflexive?  ;
qon%<vblex%>:qon   Reflexive?  ;
Qor%<vblex%>:Qor   Reflexive?  ;
qub%<vblex%>:qub   Reflexive?  ;
qum%<vblex%>:qum   Reflexive?  ;
QuS%<vblex%>:QuS   Reflexive?  ;
rach%<vblex%>:rach   Reflexive?  ;
rar%<vblex%>:rar   Reflexive?  ;
rIH%<vblex%>:rIH   Reflexive?  ;
roghmoH%<vblex%>:roghmoH   Reflexive?  ;
roSHa’moH%<vblex%>:roSHa’moH   Reflexive?  ;
rup%<vblex%>:rup   Reflexive?  ;
SaH%<vblex%>:SaH   Reflexive?  ;
SaS%<vblex%>:SaS   Reflexive?  ;
Seng%<vblex%>:Seng   Reflexive?  ;
SIch%<vblex%>:SIch   Reflexive?  ;
SIS%<vblex%>:SIS   Reflexive?  ;
SoQmoH%<vblex%>:SoQmoH   Reflexive?  ;
Such%<vblex%>:Such   Reflexive?  ;
SuQ%<vblex%>:SuQ   Reflexive?  ;
taD%<vblex%>:taD   Reflexive?  ;
ta’%<vblex%>:ta’   Reflexive?  ;
teH%<vblex%>:teH   Reflexive?  ;
tIj%<vblex%>:tIj   Reflexive?  ;
tlhab%<vblex%>:tlhab   Reflexive?  ;
tlhe’%<vblex%>:tlhe’   Reflexive?  ;
tlhob%<vblex%>:tlhob   Reflexive?  ;
tlhot%<vblex%>:tlhot   Reflexive?  ;
tlhup%<vblex%>:tlhup   Reflexive?  ;
tor%<vblex%>:tor   Reflexive?  ;
tu’lu’%<vblex%>:tu’lu’   Reflexive?  ;
tuS%<vblex%>:tuS   Reflexive?  ;
vaq%<vblex%>:vaq   Reflexive?  ;
vergh%<vblex%>:vergh   Reflexive?  ;
vonlu’%<vblex%>:vonlu’   Reflexive?  ;
vul%<vblex%>:vul   Reflexive?  ;
wagh%<vblex%>:wagh   Reflexive?  ;
wav%<vblex%>:wav   Reflexive?  ;
weq%<vblex%>:weq   Reflexive?  ;
woch%<vblex%>:woch   Reflexive?  ;
wun%<vblex%>:wun   Reflexive?  ;
yajHa’%<vblex%>:yajHa’   Reflexive?  ;
yep%<vblex%>:yep   Reflexive?  ;
yIv%<vblex%>:yIv   Reflexive?  ;
yot%<vblex%>:yot   Reflexive?  ;
